Utah statutes.
77-15-9.   Expenses.

(1)  In determining the competence of a defendant to proceed, expenses of examination, observation, or treatment, excluding travel to and from any mental health facility, shall be charged to the Department of Human Services when the offense is a state offense.  Travel expenses incurred by the defendant shall be charged to the county where prosecution is commenced.  Examination of defendants on local ordinance violations shall be charged by the department to the municipality or county commencing the prosecution.

(2)  When examination is initiated by the court or on motion of the prosecutor, expenses of commitment and treatment of the person confined to a mental health facility after examination, if he is determined to be incompetent to proceed, shall also be charged to the department.

(3)  Expenses of examination, treatment, or confinement in a mental health facility for any person who has been convicted of a crime and placed in a state correctional facility shall be charged to the Department of Corrections.

(4)  If the defendant, after examination, is found to be competent by the court, all subsequent costs are charged to the county commencing prosecution. If the defendant requested the examination and is found to be competent by the court, the department may recover the expenses of the examination from the defendant.



Amended by Chapter 162, 1994 General Session

